Object;Wikipedia;Wiktionary;WordNet;Collins;MerriamWebster;Macmillan;Dictionary;AmericanHeritage;Lexico;GraspType;Grasp
Acorn;The acorn, or oaknut, is the nut of the oaks and their close relatives (genera "Quercus" and "Lithocarpus", in the family Fagaceae). It usually contains one seed (occasionally  two seeds), enclosed in a tough, leathery shell, and borne in a cup-shaped cupule. Acorns are long and on the fat side. Acorns take between 6 and 24 months (depending on the species) to mature, see the list of "Quercus" species for details of oak classification, in which acorn morphology and phenology are important factors.;The fruit of the oak, being an oval nut growing in a woody cup or cupule.;fruit of the oak tree: a smooth thin-walled nut in a woody cup-shaped base;An acorn is a pale oval nut that is the fruit of an oak tree. ;the nut of the oak usually seated in or surrounded by a hard woody cupule of indurated bracts;the nut of an oak tree, shaped like a small egg with a cover like a cup at one end;the typically ovoid fruit or nut of an oak, enclosed at the base by a cupule.;The fruit of an oak, consisting of a single-seeded, thick-walled nut set in a woody, cuplike base.;The fruit of the oak tree, a smooth oval nut in a rough cup-shaped base.;Precision;2
Apple;An apple is an edible fruit produced by an apple tree (Malus domestica). Apple trees are cultivated worldwide and are the most widely grown species in the genus "Malus". The tree originated in Central Asia, where its wild ancestor, "Malus sieversii", is still found today. Apples have been grown for thousands of years in Asia and Europe and were brought to North America by European colonists. Apples have religious and mythological significance in many cultures, including Norse, Greek, and European Christian tradition.;A common, round fruit produced by the tree Malus domestica, cultivated in temperate climates.;fruit with red or yellow or green skin and sweet to tart crisp whitish flesh;An apple is a round fruit with smooth green, yellow, or red skin and firm white flesh.;the fleshy, usually rounded red, yellow, or green edible pome fruit of a usually cultivated tree (genus Malus) of the rose family;a hard round fruit that is white inside and has a smooth green, yellow, or red skin, which is called peel when it has been removed. The middle part of the apple containing the seeds is called the core. Apples grow on apple trees.;the usually round, red or yellow, edible fruit of a small tree, Malus sylvestris, of the rose family.;A cultivated deciduous tree (Malus domestica or M. pumila) in the rose family, native to Eurasia and having alternate simple leaves and white or pink flowers.  The firm, edible, usually rounded fruit of this tree.;The round fruit of a tree of the rose family, which typically has thin red or green skin and crisp flesh. Many varieties have been developed as dessert or cooking fruit or for making cider.;Power;1
Apricot;An apricot (, ) is a fruit, or the tree that bears the fruit, of several species in the genus "Prunus" (stone fruits).;A round sweet and juicy stone fruit, resembling peach or plum in taste, with a yellow-orange flesh, lightly fuzzy skin and a large seed inside.;Asian tree having clusters of usually white blossoms and edible fruit resembling the peach;An apricot is a small, soft, round fruit with yellowish-orange flesh and a stone inside. ;the oval orange-colored fruit of a temperate-zone tree (Prunus armeniaca) resembling the related peach and plum in flavor;a soft fruit with an orange-yellow skin and a large hard seed inside;the downy, yellow, sometimes rosy fruit, somewhat resembling a small peach, of the tree Prunus armeniaca.;A deciduous tree (Prunus armeniaca) native to Asia, having alternate leaves and clusters of usually white flowers. The edible orange-yellow fruit of this tree.;A juicy, soft fruit, resembling a small peach, of an orange-yellow color.;Power;1
Avocado;The avocado ("Persea americana"), a tree likely originating from south-central Mexico, is classified as a member of the flowering plant family Lauraceae. The fruit of the plant, also called an avocado (or avocado pear or alligator pear), is botanically a large berry containing a single large seed. Avocado trees are partially self-pollinating, and are often propagated through grafting to maintain predictable fruit quality and quantity.;The large, usually yellowish-green or black, pulpy fruit of the avocado tree.;a pear-shaped tropical fruit with green or blackish skin and rich yellowish pulp enclosing a single large seed;Avocados are pear-shaped vegetables, with hard skins and large stones, which are usually eaten raw. ;a pulpy green- to purple-skinned nutty-flavored fruit of any of various tropical American trees (genus Persea especially P. americana) of the laurel family;a fruit with green or black skin, a very large seed in the middle, and pale green flesh that does not taste sweet. It is usually eaten raw in salads.;Also called alligator pear. a large, usually pear-shaped fruit having green to blackish skin, a single large seed, and soft, light-green pulp, borne by the tropical American tree Persea americana and its variety P. adrymifolia, often eaten raw, especially in salads.;A tropical American tree (Persea americana) having oval or pear-shaped fruit with leathery skin, yellowish-green flesh, and a large seed. The edible fruit of this tree. Also called alligator pear, avocado pear. ;A pear-shaped fruit with a rough leathery skin, smooth oily edible flesh, and a large stone. Also called alligator pear;Power;1
Ballpoint pen;A ballpoint pen, also known as a biro (British English), ball pen (Philippine English), or dot pen (Nepali) is a pen that dispenses ink (usually in paste form) over a metal ball at its point, i.e. over a "ball point". The metal commonly used is steel, brass, or tungsten carbide. The design was conceived and developed as a cleaner and more reliable alternative to dip pens and fountain pens, and it is now the world's most-used writing instrument, millions are manufactured and sold daily. It has influenced art and graphic design and spawned an artwork genre.;A pen, similar in size and shape to a pencil, having an internal chamber filled with a viscous, quick-drying ink that is dispensed at the tip during use by the rolling action of a metal sphere (around 0.7 mm to 1 mm in diameter).;;a pen having, instead of a point, a small ball bearing that picks up its ink by rolling against an interior ink reservoir;a pen having as the writing point a small rotating metal ball that inks itself by contact with an inner magazine;a pen with a very small ball at the end from which ink flows as you write;a pen in which the point is a fine ball bearing that rotates against a supply of semisolid ink in a cartridge, thus rolling the ink onto paper.;;A pen with a tiny ball as its writing point. The ball transfers ink from a cartridge to the paper.;Precision;3
Banana;A banana is an elongated, edible fruit – botanically a berry – produced by several kinds of large herbaceous flowering plants in the genus "Musa". In some countries, bananas used for cooking may be called "plantains", distinguishing them from dessert bananas. The fruit is variable in size, color, and firmness, but is usually elongated and curved, with soft flesh rich in starch covered with a rind, which may be green, yellow, red, purple, or brown when ripe. The fruits grow in clusters hanging from the top of the plant. Almost all modern edible seedless (parthenocarp) bananas come from two wild species – "Musa acuminata" and "Musa balbisiana". The scientific names of most cultivated bananas are "Musa acuminata", "Musa balbisiana", and "Musa" × "paradisiaca" for the hybrid "Musa acuminata" × "M. balbisiana", depending on their genomic constitution. The old scientific name for this hybrid, "Musa sapientum", is no longer used.;An elongated curved tropical fruit that grows in bunches and has a creamy flesh and a smooth skin.;any of several tropical and subtropical treelike herbs of the genus Musa having a terminal crown of large entire leaves and usually bearing hanging clusters of elongated fruits;Bananas are long curved fruit with yellow skins. ;an elongated usually tapering tropical fruit with soft pulpy flesh enclosed in a soft usually yellow rind;a long curved fruit with a yellow skin;a tropical plant of the genus Musa, certain species of which are cultivated for their nutritious fruit.Compare banana family.;Any of several treelike plants of the genus Musa, especially M. acuminata, having a terminal crown of large, entire leaves and a hanging cluster of fruits.  The elongated, edible fruit of these plants, having a thick yellowish to reddish skin and whitish, pulpy flesh.;A long curved fruit which grows in clusters and has soft pulpy flesh and yellow skin when ripe.;Power;1
Banknote;A banknote (often known as a bill (in the US and Canada), paper money, or simply a note) is a type of negotiable promissory note, made by a bank or other licensed authority, payable to the bearer on demand. Banknotes were originally issued by commercial banks, which were legally required to redeem the notes for legal tender (usually gold or silver coin) when presented to the chief cashier of the originating bank. These commercial banknotes only traded at face value in the market served by the issuing bank. Commercial banknotes have primarily been replaced by national banknotes issued by central banks or monetary authorities.;A piece of paper currency.;a piece of paper money (especially one issued by a central bank);Banknotes are pieces of paper money. ;a promissory note issued by a bank payable to bearer on demand without interest and acceptable as money;a piece of paper money. The usual word is note.;a promissory note, payable on demand, issued by an authorized bank and intended to circulate as money.;A piece of paper currency. A promissory note issued by a central bank.;A piece of paper money, constituting a central bank's promissory note to pay a stated sum to the bearer on demand.;Power;0
Barrette;A barrette (American English), also known as a hair clasp (British English), or a hair clip, is a clasp for holding hair in place. They are often made from metal or plastic and sometimes feature decorative fabric. In one type of barrette, a clasp is used to secure the barrette in place, the clasp opens when the two metal pieces at either side are pressed together.;A clasp or clip for gathering and holding the hair.;a pin for holding women's hair in place;A barrette is a small metal or plastic device that a woman uses to hold her hair in position. ;a clip or bar for holding hair in place;a slide that a woman wears in her hair;a clasp for holding a woman's or girl's hair in place.;A small clasp for holding the hair in place.;A typically bar-shaped clip or ornament for the hair.;Precision;2
Battery;Battery may refer to:;A device used to power electric devices, consisting of a set of electrically connected electrochemical or, archaically, electrostatic cells. A single such cell when used by itself.;group of guns or missile launchers operated together at one place;Batteries are small devices that provide the power for electrical items such as torches and children's toys.;the act of beating someone or something with successive blows : the act of battering (see batter entry 1 sense 1);an object that fits into something such as a radio, clock, or car and supplies it with electricity;Also called galvanic battery, voltaic battery. Electricity. a combination of two or more cells electrically connected to work together to produce electric energy. See also cell (def. 7a).;Electricity A device containing an electric cell or a series of electric cells storing chemical energy that can be converted into electrical energy, usually in the form of direct current. A device that stores mechanical or other energy for later use.;A container consisting of one or more cells, in which chemical energy is converted into electricity and used as a source of power.;Precision;2
Bead;A bead is a small, decorative object that is formed in a variety of shapes and sizes of a material such as stone, bone, shell, glass, plastic, wood or pearl and with a small hole for threading or stringing. Beads range in size from under to over in diameter. A pair of beads made from "Nassarius" sea snail shells, approximately 100,000 years old, are thought to be the earliest known examples of jewellery. Beadwork is the art or craft of making things with beads. Beads can be woven together with specialized thread, strung onto thread or soft, flexible wire, or adhered to a surface (e.g. fabric, clay).;Prayer, later especially with a rosary.;a small ball with a hole through the middle;Beads are small pieces of coloured glass, wood, or plastic with a hole through the middle. Beads are often put together on a piece of string or wire to make jewellery. ;obsolete : prayer —usually used in plural ;a small usually round piece of plastic, glass, metal etc with a hole through it, that you put on a string or chain with other beads and wear as jewellery;a small, usually round object of glass, wood, stone, or the like with a hole through it, often strung with others of its kind in necklaces, rosaries, etc.;A small, often round piece of material, such as glass, plastic, or wood, that is pierced for stringing or threading. beads A necklace made of such pieces. beads Roman Catholic Church A rosary. often beads Obsolete A prayer.;A small piece of glass, stone, or similar material, typically rounded and perforated for threading with others as a necklace or rosary or for sewing onto fabric.;Precision;2
Beer bottle;A beer bottle is a bottle designed as a container for beer. Such designs vary greatly in size and shape, but the glass commonly is brown or green to reduce spoilage from light, especially ultraviolet.;A bottle, commonly made of brown or green glass, designed as a container for beer.;;a bottle for beer;;;;;;Power;1
Billiard ball;A billiard ball is a small, hard ball used in cue sports, such as carom billiards, pool, and snooker. The number, type, diameter, color, and pattern of the balls differ depending upon the specific game being played. Various particular ball properties such as hardness, friction coefficient and resilience are important to accuracy.;;;a hard ball used in billiards;one of the balls used in playing billiards;;one of the balls used in the game of billiards.;;;Precision;2
Book;A book is a medium for recording information in the form of writing or images, typically composed of many pages (made of papyrus, parchment, vellum, or paper) bound together and protected by a cover. The technical term for this physical arrangement is "codex" (plural, "codices"). In the history of hand-held physical supports for extended written compositions or records, the codex replaces its predecessor, the scroll. A single sheet in a codex is a leaf and each side of a leaf is a page.;A collection of sheets of paper bound together to hinge at one edge, containing printed or written material, pictures, etc. She opened the book to page 37 and began to read aloud.;a written work or composition that has been published (printed on pages bound together);A book is a number of pieces of paper, usually with words printed on them, which are fastened together and fixed inside a cover of stronger paper or cardboard. Books contain information, stories, or poetry, for example. ;a set of written sheets of skin or paper or tablets of wood or ivory;a written work that is published, either as printed pages inside a cover or electronically;a handwritten or printed work of fiction or nonfiction, usually on sheets of paper fastened or bound together within covers.;A set of written, printed, or blank pages fastened along one side and encased between protective covers.  An e-book or other electronic resource structured like a book.;A written or printed work consisting of pages glued or sewn together along one side and bound in covers.;Power;0
Bookmark;A bookmark is a thin marking tool, commonly made of card, leather, or fabric, used to keep track of a reader's progress in a book and allow the reader to easily return to where the previous reading session ended. Alternate materials for bookmarks are paper, metals like silver and brass, silk, wood, cord (sewing), and plastic. Some books may have one or more bookmarks made of woven ribbon sewn into the binding. Other bookmarks incorporate a page-flap that enables them to be clipped on a page.;A strip of material used to mark a place in a book.;a marker (a piece of paper or ribbon) placed between the pages of a book to mark the reader's place;A bookmark is a narrow piece of card or leather that you put between the pages of a book so that you can find a particular page easily. ;or bookmarker \ ˈbu̇k-​ˌmär-​kər \ : a marker for finding a place in a book ;something you put inside a book so that you can find the page you want;a ribbon or other marker placed between the pages of a book to mark a place.;A strip of material, as of ribbon or leather, or a metal clamp, that is placed between the pages of a book to mark the reader's place.;A strip of leather, card, or other material, used to mark one's place in a book.;Power;0
Bottle;A bottle is a narrow-necked container made of an impermeable material (clay, glass, plastic, aluminium etc.) in various shapes and sizes to store and transport liquids (water, milk, beer, wine, ink, cooking oil, medicine, soft drinks, shampoo, and chemicals, etc.) and whose mouth at the bottling line can be sealed with an internal stopper, an external bottle cap, a closure, or a conductive "inner seal" using induction sealing. Some of the earliest bottles appeared in China, Phoenicia, Crete, and Rome.;A container, typically made of glass or plastic and having a tapered neck, used primarily for holding liquids.;a glass or plastic vessel used for storing drinks or other liquids, typically cylindrical without handles and with a narrow neck that can be plugged or capped;A bottle is a glass or plastic container in which drinks and other liquids are kept. Bottles are usually round with straight sides and a narrow top. ;a rigid or semirigid container typically of glass or plastic having a comparatively narrow neck or mouth and usually no handle;a glass or plastic container for liquids, usually with a narrow part at the top that is called the neck;a portable container for holding liquids, characteristically having a neck and mouth and made of glass or plastic.;A receptacle having a narrow neck, usually no handles, and a mouth that can be plugged, corked, or capped.;A glass or plastic container with a narrow neck, used for storing drinks or other liquids.;Power;1
Bowl;A bowl is a round dish or container typically used to prepare and serve food. The interior of a bowl is characteristically shaped like a spherical cap, with the edges and the bottom forming a seamless curve. This makes bowls especially suited for holding liquids and loose food, as the contents of the bowl are naturally concentrated in its center by the force of gravity. The exterior of a bowl is most often round but can be of any shape, including rectangular.;A roughly hemispherical container used to hold, mix or present food, such as salad, fruit or soup, or other items.;a round vessel that is open at the top, used chiefly for holding food or liquids;A bowl is a round container with a wide uncovered top. Some kinds of bowl are used, for example, for serving or eating food from, or in cooking, while other larger kinds are used for washing or cleaning. ;a concave usually nearly hemispherical vessel : a rounded container that is usually larger than a cup;a round container used for eating, serving, or preparing food;a rather deep, round dish or basin, used chiefly for holding liquids, food, etc.;A hemispherical vessel, wider than it is deep, used for holding food or fluids.;A round, deep dish or basin used for food or liquid.;Power;0
Box;A box (plural: boxes) is a container used for the storage or transportation of its contents. Most boxes have flat, parallel, rectangular sides. Boxes can be very small (like a matchbox) or very large (like a shipping box for furniture), and can be used for a variety of purposes from functional to decorative.;Senses relating to a three-dimensional object or space.;a (usually rectangular) container, may have a lid;A box is a square or rectangular container with hard or stiff sides. Boxes often have lids. ;a rigid typically rectangular container with or without a cover;a container with straight sides, a flat base, and sometimes a lid;a container, case, or receptacle, usually rectangular, of wood, metal, cardboard, etc., and often with a lid or removable cover.;A container typically constructed with four sides perpendicular to the base and often having a lid or cover.  The amount or quantity that such a container can hold.;A container with a flat base and sides, typically square or rectangular and having a lid.;Power;0
Bun;A bun is a small, sometimes sweet, bread-based item or roll. Though they come in many shapes and sizes, they are most commonly hand-sized or smaller, with a round top and flat bottom.;A small bread roll, often sweetened or spiced.;small rounded bread either plain or sweet;Buns are small bread rolls. They are sometimes sweet and may contain dried fruit or spices. ;a sweet or plain small bread;a small round cake, especially with a sweet sticky surface;any of a wide variety of variously shaped bread rolls, usually leavened and slightly sweetened or plain, sometimes containing spices, dried currants, etc.;An unsweetened round or oblong roll, used especially to hold a hamburger patty or a hot dog. A small sweetened roll, often spiced or containing dried fruit.;A small cake, typically containing dried fruit.;Precision;2
Candle;A candle is an ignitable wick embedded in wax, or another flammable solid substance such as tallow, that provides light, and in some cases, a fragrance. A candle can also provide heat or a method of keeping time.;A light source consisting of a wick embedded in a solid, flammable substance such as wax, tallow, or paraffin.;stick of wax with a wick in the middle;A candle is a stick of hard wax with a piece of string called a wick through the middle. You light the wick in order to give a steady flame that provides light. ;a usually molded or dipped mass of wax or tallow containing a wick that may be burned (as to give light, heat, or scent or for celebration or votive purposes);a stick of wax with a string in it called a wick that you burn to give light;a long, usually slender piece of tallow or wax with an embedded wick that is burned to give light.;A solid, usually cylindrical mass of tallow, wax, or other fatty substance with an axially embedded wick that is burned to provide light.;A cylinder or block of wax or tallow with a central wick which is lit to produce light as it burns.;Power;1
Chalice;A chalice (from Latin 'mug', borrowed from Ancient Greek () 'cup') or goblet is a footed cup intended to hold a drink. In religious practice, a chalice is often used for drinking during a ceremony or may carry a certain symbolic meaning.;A large drinking cup, often having a stem and base and used especially for formal occasions and religious ceremonies.;a bowl-shaped drinking vessel, especially the Eucharistic cup;A chalice is a large gold or silver cup with a stem. Chalices are used to hold wine in the Christian service of Holy Communion. ;a drinking cup;a large cup for wine, especially one used during the Christian ceremony of Holy Communion;Ecclesiastical. a cup for the wine of the Eucharist or Mass.;A cup or goblet.;historical A large cup or goblet.;Power;1
Chalk;Chalk is a soft, white, porous, sedimentary carbonate rock. It is a form of limestone composed of the mineral calcite and originally formed deep under the sea by the compression of microscopic plankton that had settled to the sea floor. Chalk is common throughout Western Europe, where deposits underlie parts of France, and steep cliffs are often seen where they meet the sea in places such as the Dover cliffs on the Kent coast of the English Channel.;A soft, white, powdery limestone.;a soft whitish calcite;Chalk is a type of soft white rock. You can use small pieces of it for writing or drawing with. ;a soft white, gray, or buff limestone composed chiefly of the shells of foraminifers;a type of soft white stone;a soft, white, powdery limestone consisting chiefly of fossil shells of foraminifers.;A soft compact calcite, CaCO3, with varying amounts of silica, quartz, feldspar, or other mineral impurities, generally gray-white or yellow-white and derived chiefly from fossil seashells.;A white soft earthy limestone (calcium carbonate) formed from the skeletal remains of sea creatures.;Precision;3
Chess piece;A chess piece, or chessman, is any of the six different types of movable objects used on a chessboard to play the game of chess.;Any of the 16 white and 16 black pieces used in playing the game of chess.;;;;;;;;Precision;2
Chestnut;The chestnuts are the deciduous trees and shrubs in the genus Castanea, in the beech family Fagaceae. They are native to temperate regions of the Northern Hemisphere.;A tree or shrub of the genus Castanea.;wood of any of various chestnut trees of the genus Castanea;A chestnut or chestnut tree is a tall tree with broad leaves. Chestnut is the wood of this tree.;any of a genus (Castanea) of trees or shrubs of the beech family;a large smooth red-brown nut that you can eat;any of the several deciduous trees constituting the genus Castanea, of the beech family, having toothed, oblong leaves and bearing edible nuts enclosed in a prickly bur, and including C. dentata(American chestnut ), which has been virtually destroyed by the chestnut blight, C. sativa(European chestnut ),C. mollissima(Chinese chestnut ), and C. crenata(Japanese chestnut ).;Any of several deciduous trees of the genus Castanea native to northern temperate regions, having alternate simple toothed leaves, and nuts that are enclosed in a prickly husk.;A glossy hard brown edible nut which develops within a bristly case and which may be roasted and eaten.;Precision;2
Chocolate bar;A chocolate bar (Commonwealth English) or candy bar (some dialects of American English) is a confection containing chocolate, which may also contain layerings or mixtures that include nuts, fruit, caramel, nougat, and wafers. A wide variety of chocolate bar brands are sold. A popular example is a Snickers bar, which consists of nougat mixed with caramel and peanuts, covered in milk chocolate.;A bar of chocolate, either solid or with a filling such as nuts or caramel.;;a block of chocolate;;;;;A flattish rectangular block of chocolate manufactured as an item of confectionery, usually sold individually wrapped (also) any similarly-shaped item of confectionery that is coated or flavoured with chocolate.;Power;0
Cigarette;A cigarette is a narrow cylinder containing burnable material, typically tobacco, that is rolled into thin paper for smoking. Across all forms of tobacco consumption both smoking and nonsmoking cigarettes are the most purchased and consumed tobacco item, creating a multibillion-dollar industry. Most commercially available cigarettes are manufactured the same way using tobacco that is treated with butterfat and sugar to mask the bitter taste of nicotine. Tobacco companies also use tobacco that has been freebased or modified to increase the speed of nicotine delivery. Cigarettes also contain tobacco that has been exposed to carbon dioxide to act as a cigarette filler.;Tobacco or other substances, in a thin roll wrapped with paper, intended to be smoked.;finely ground tobacco wrapped in paper, for smoking;Cigarettes are small tubes of paper containing tobacco which people smoke.;a slender roll of cut tobacco enclosed in paper and meant to be smoked;a narrow paper tube containing tobacco that people smoke;a cylindrical roll of finely cut tobacco cured for smoking, considerably smaller than most cigars and usually wrapped in thin white paper.;A small roll of finely cut tobacco for smoking, enclosed in a wrapper of thin paper.;A thin cylinder of finely cut tobacco rolled in paper for smoking.;Precision;3
Clementine;A clementine ("Citrus × clementina") is a tangor, a citrus fruit hybrid between a willowleaf mandarin orange ("C." × "deliciosa") and a sweet orange ("C. × sinensis"), named for its late 19th-century discoverer. The exterior is a deep orange colour with a smooth, glossy appearance. Clementines can be separated into 7 to 14 segments. Similar to tangerines, they tend to be easy to peel. They are typically juicy and sweet, with less acid than oranges. Their oils, like other citrus fruits, contain mostly limonene as well as myrcene, linalool, α-pinene and many complex aromatics.;A type of small, sweet orange, the result of a cross between a tangerine and Seville orange.;a variety of mandarin orange that is grown around the Mediterranean and in South Africa;A clementine is a fruit that looks like a small orange. ;a small nearly seedless citrus fruit that is probably a hybrid between a tangerine and an orange;a fruit similar to a small orange;a small, sweet variety of tangerine with orange-red skin.;A deep red-orange, often seedless mandarin orange.;A tangerine of a deep orange-red North African variety which is grown around the Mediterranean and in South Africa.;Power;1
Coin;A coin is a small, flat, (usually, depending on the country or value) round piece of metal or plastic used primarily as a medium of exchange or legal tender. They are standardized in weight, and produced in large quantities at a mint in order to facilitate trade. They are most often issued by a government. Coins often have images, numerals, or text on them. "Obverse" and its opposite, "reverse", refer to the two flat faces of coins and medals. In this usage, "obverse" means the front face of the object and "reverse" means the back face. The obverse of a coin is commonly called "heads", because it often depicts the head of a prominent person, and the reverse "tails".;Abbreviation of counterinsurgency.;a flat metal piece (usually a disc) used as money;A coin is a small piece of metal which is used as money. ;;a flat round piece of metal with special designs on it, used as money. A piece of money made from paper is called a banknote or a note.;a piece of metal stamped and issued by the authority of a government for use as money.;A small piece of metal, usually flat and circular, authorized by a government for use as money.;A flat disc or piece of metal with an official stamp, used as money.;Power;0
Comb;A comb is a tool consisting of a shaft that holds a row of teeth for pulling through the hair to clean, untangle, or style it. Combs have been used since prehistoric times, having been discovered in very refined forms from settlements dating back to 5,000 years ago in Persia.;A toothed implement for grooming the hair or (formerly) for keeping it in place.;a flat device with narrow pointed teeth on one edge, disentangles or arranges hair;A comb is a flat piece of plastic or metal with narrow pointed teeth along one side, which you use to tidy your hair. ;a toothed instrument used especially for adjusting, cleaning, or confining hair;an object that you pull through your hair to make it tidy, with a row of thin pointed parts called teeth;a toothed strip of plastic, hard rubber, bone, wood, or metal, used for arranging the hair, untangling it, or holding it in place.;A thin toothed strip, as of plastic, used to smooth, arrange, or fasten the hair.  An implement, such as one for dressing and cleansing wool or other fiber, that resembles a hair comb in shape or use. A currycomb.;A strip of plastic, metal, or wood with a row of narrow teeth, used for untangling or arranging the hair.;Power;0
Compact disk;;A form of digital media on a plastic disc read by a laser in a CD drive. It comes in several varieties including CD-ROM, CD-R, and CD-RW.;;Compact discs are small shiny discs that contain music or computer information. The abbreviation CD is also used. ;;a CD;a type of compact disk developed to store and play back music.;A small optical disc on which data such as music, text, or graphic images is digitally encoded.;A small plastic disc on which music or other digital information is stored in the form of a pattern of metal-coated pits from which it can be read using laser light reflected off the disc.;Power;0
Credit card;A credit card is a payment card issued to users (cardholders) to enable the cardholder to pay a merchant for goods and services based on the cardholder's accrued debt (i.e., promise to the card issuer to pay them for the amounts plus the other agreed charges). The card issuer (usually a bank) creates a revolving account and grants a line of credit to the cardholder, from which the cardholder can borrow money for payment to a merchant or as a cash advance.;A plastic card, usually with a magnetic strip or an embedded microchip, connected to a credit account and used to buy goods or services.;;A credit card is a plastic card that you use to buy goods on credit. Compare charge card. ;a card authorizing purchases on credit;a small plastic card that you use to buy things now and pay for them later. A similar card that you use to pay for things directly from your bank account is called a debit card.;a card that identifies a person as entitled to have food, merchandise, services, etc., billed on a charge account.;A plastic card having a magnetic strip, issued by a bank or business authorizing the holder to buy goods or services on credit. Also called charge card.;A small plastic card issued by a bank, building society, etc., allowing the holder to purchase goods or services on credit.;Power;0
Cucumber;Cucumber ("Cucumis sativus") is a widely-cultivated creeping vine plant in the "Cucurbitaceae" gourd family that bears usually cylindrical fruits, which are used as vegetables. Considered an annual plant, there are three main varieties of cucumber — slicing, pickling, and burpless/seedless — within which several cultivars have been created. The cucumber originates from South Asia, but now grows on most continents, as many different types of cucumber are traded on the global market. In North America, the term "wild cucumber" refers to plants in the genera "Echinocystis" and "Marah", though the two are not closely related.;A vine in the gourd family, Cucumis sativus.;a melon vine of the genus Cucumis, cultivated from earliest times for its cylindrical green fruit;A cucumber is a long thin vegetable with a hard green skin and wet transparent flesh. It is eaten raw in salads.;the fruit of a vine (Cucumis sativus) of the gourd family cultivated as a garden vegetable;a long thin vegetable that has a dark green skin and is white inside. It is usually eaten raw in salads.;a creeping plant, Cucumis sativus, of the gourd family, occurring in many cultivated forms.;A tendril-bearing, climbing or sprawling annual plant (Cucumis sativus) widely cultivated for its edible cylindrical fruit that has a green rind and crisp white flesh. The fruit of this plant, harvested when immature and eaten fresh or pickled.;A long, green-skinned fruit with watery flesh, usually eaten raw in salads or pickled.;Power;1
Cup;A cup is an open-top container used to hold liquids for pouring or drinking, while mainly used for drinking, it also can be used to store solids for pouring (e.g., sugar, flour, grains). Cups may be made of glass, metal, china, clay, wood, stone, polystyrene, plastic, aluminium or other materials, and are usually fixed with a stem, handles, or other adornments. Cups are used for quenching thirst across a wide range of cultures and social classes, and different styles of cups may be used for different liquids or in different situations. Cups of different styles may be used for different types of liquids or other foodstuffs (e.g. teacups and measuring cups), in different situations (e.g. at water stations or in ceremonies and rituals),or for decoration.;A concave vessel for drinking from, usually made of opaque material (as opposed to a glass) and with a handle.;a small open container usually used for drinking, usually has a handle;A cup is a small round container that you drink from. Cups usually have handles and are made from china or plastic. ;an open usually bowl-shaped drinking vessel;a small round container for a drink, usually with a handle;a small, open container made of china, glass, metal, etc., usually having a handle and used chiefly as a receptable from which to drink tea, soup, etc.;A small open container, usually with a flat bottom and a handle, used for drinking. Such a container and its contents.;A small bowl-shaped container for drinking from, typically having a handle.;Power;1
Dice;Dice (singular die or dice) are small, throwable objects with marked sides that can rest in multiple positions. They are used for generating random numbers, commonly as part of tabletop games, including dice games, board games, role-playing games, and games of chance.;Gaming with one or more dice.;a small cube with 1 to 6 spots on the six faces, used in gambling to generate random numbers;A dice is a small cube which has between one and six spots or numbers on its sides, and which is used in games to provide random numbers. In old-fashioned English, 'dice' was used only as a plural form, and the singular was die, but now 'dice' is used as both the singular and the plural form. ;;a small block of wood or plastic with six sides marked with spots, that you roll or throw to play a game;small cubes of plastic, ivory, bone, or wood, marked on each side with one to six spots, usually used in pairs in games of chance or in gambling.;Plural of die2.;A small cube with each side having a different number of spots on it, ranging from one to six, thrown and used in gambling and other games involving chance.;Precision;2
Donut;;A deep-fried piece of dough or batter, commonly made in a toroidal or ellipsoidal shape, and mixed with various sweeteners and flavors, sometimes filled with jelly, custard or cream.;a small ring-shaped friedcake;;a small usually ring-shaped piece of sweet fried dough;a doughnut;a variant of doughnut. ;Variant of doughnut.;A small fried cake of sweetened dough, typically in the shape of a ball or ring.;Power;0
Earring;An earring is a piece of jewelry attached to the ear via a piercing in the earlobe or another external part of the ear (except in the case of clip earrings, which clip onto the lobe). Earrings have been worn by people in different civilizations and historic periods, often with cultural significance.;A piece of jewelry worn on the ear.;jewelry to ornament the ear, usually clipped to the earlobe or fastened through a hole in the lobe;Earrings are pieces of jewellery which you attach to your ears. ;an ornament for the ear and especially the earlobe;a piece of jewellery that you wear on your ear;an ornament worn on or hanging from the lobe of the ear. ;An ornament worn on or suspended from the ear, especially the earlobe.;A piece of jewellery worn on the lobe or edge of the ear.;Precision;2
Egg;An egg is the organic vessel containing the zygote in which an embryo develops until it can survive on its own, at which point the animal hatches. An egg results from fertilization of an egg cell. Most arthropods, vertebrates (excluding live-bearing mammals), and mollusks lay eggs, although some, such as scorpions, do not.;An approximately spherical or ellipsoidal body produced by birds, reptiles, insects and other animals, housing the embryo during its development.;animal reproductive body consisting of an ovum or embryo together with nutritive and protective envelopes, especially the thin-shelled reproductive body laid by e.g. female birds;An egg is an oval object that is produced by a female bird and which contains a baby bird. Other animals such as reptiles and fish also lay eggs. ;the hard-shelled reproductive body produced by a bird and especially by the common domestic chicken;the round object with a shell that a female bird produces and a baby bird develops in. The mother bird lays an egg, and later the egg hatches and the baby bird comes out;the roundish reproductive body produced by the female of certain animals, as birds and most reptiles, consisting of an ovum and its envelope of albumen, jelly, membranes, egg case, or shell, according to species.;A female gamete, an ovum. Also called egg cell. The round or oval female reproductive body of various animals, including birds, reptiles, amphibians, fishes, and insects, consisting usually of an embryo surrounded by nutrient material and a protective covering.  The oval, thin-shelled reproductive body of a bird, especially that of a hen, used as food.;An oval or round object laid by a female bird, reptile, fish, or invertebrate, usually containing a developing embryo. The eggs of birds are enclosed in a chalky shell, while those of reptiles are in a leathery membrane.;Precision;2
Envelope;An envelope is a common packaging item, usually made of thin, flat material. It is designed to contain a flat object, such as a letter or card.;A paper or cardboard wrapper used to enclose small, flat items, especially letters, for mailing.;a flat (usually rectangular) container for a letter, thin package, etc.;An envelope is the rectangular paper cover in which you send a letter to someone through the post. ;a flat usually paper container (as for a letter);a flat paper case for a letter or document, with a part that you stick down to close it before you write an address on it and send it through the post;a flat paper container, as for a letter or thin package, usually having a gummed flap or other means of closure.;A flat paper container, especially for a letter, usually having a gummed flap.;A flat paper container with a sealable flap, used to enclose a letter or document.;Power;0
Flashlight;A flashlight, (US) or torch (UK, Australia) is a portable hand-held electric light. Formerly, the light source typically was a miniature incandescent light bulb but these have been displaced by light-emitting diodes (LEDs) since the mid-2000s. A typical flashlight consists of the light source mounted in a reflector, a transparent cover (sometimes combined with a lens) to protect the light source and reflector, a battery, and a switch, all enclosed in a case.;A battery-powered hand-held light source.;a small portable battery-powered electric lamp;A flashlight is a small electric light which gets its power from batteries and which you can carry in your hand.;a small battery-operated portable electric light;a torch;Also called, especially British, torch . a small, portable electric lamp powered by dry batteries, LEDs, or a tiny generator.;A small portable lamp usually powered by batteries.;An electric torch.;Power;1
Flask;Flask may refer to:;A narrow-necked vessel of metal or glass, used for various purposes, as of sheet metal, to carry gunpowder in, or of wrought iron, to contain quicksilver, or of glass, to heat water in, etc.;bottle that has a narrow neck;A flask is a bottle which you use for carrying drinks around with you. ;a container often somewhat narrowed toward the outlet and often fitted with a closure: such as;a vacuum flask;a bottle, usually of glass, having a rounded body and a narrow neck, used especially in laboratory experimentation.;A small container, such as a bottle, having a narrow neck and usually a cap, especially: A flat, relatively thin container for liquor. A container or case for carrying gunpowder or shot. A vial or round long-necked vessel for laboratory use.;A container for liquids.;Power;1
Fork;In cutlery or kitchenware, a fork (from 'pitchfork') is a utensil, now usually made of metal, whose long handle terminates in a head that branches into several narrow and often slightly curved tines with which one can spear foods either to hold them to cut with a knife or to lift them to the mouth.;A pronged tool having a long straight handle, used for digging, lifting, throwing etc.;cutlery used for serving and eating food;A fork is a tool used for eating food which has a row of three or four long metal points at the end. ;an implement with two or more prongs used especially for taking up (as in eating), pitching, or digging;a metal or plastic object used for eating, consisting of a handle with three or four sharp points on the end;an instrument having two or more prongs or tines, for holding, lifting, etc., as an implement for handling food or any of various agricultural tools.;A utensil with two or more prongs, used for eating or serving food.;An implement with two or more prongs used for lifting food to the mouth or holding it when cutting.;Precision;3
Fountain pen;A fountain pen is a writing instrument which uses a metal nib to apply a water-based ink to paper. It is distinguished from earlier dip pens by using an internal reservoir to hold ink, eliminating the need to repeatedly dip the pen in an inkwell during use. The pen draws ink from the reservoir through a feed to the nib and deposits it on paper via a combination of gravity and capillary action. Filling the reservoir with ink may be achieved manually, via the use of an eyedropper or syringe, or via an internal filling mechanism which creates suction (for example, through a piston mechanism) or a vacuum to transfer ink directly through the nib into the reservoir. Some pens employ removable reservoirs in the form of pre-filled ink cartridges.;A pen containing a reservoir of ink, which is fed to a writing nib automatically.;;A fountain pen is a pen which uses ink that you have drawn up inside it from a bottle. ;a pen containing an ink reservoir that automatically feeds a metal writing point;a pen that has a container inside that you fill with ink in order to write with it;a pen with a refillable reservoir that provides a continuous supply of usually fluid ink to its point.;A pen having a refillable or replaceable ink reservoir that feeds ink to the nib.;A pen with a reservoir or cartridge from which ink flows continuously to the nib.;Precision;3
Frisbee;A flying disc (also called a Frisbee or simply a disc) is a gliding toy or sporting item that is generally made of injection-molded plastic and roughly in diameter with a pronounced lip. It is used recreationally and competitively for throwing and catching, as in flying disc games. The shape of the disc is an airfoil in cross-section which allows it to fly by generating lift as it moves through the air. Spinning the disc imparts a stabilizing gyroscopic force, allowing it to be both aimed with accuracy and thrown for distance.;A disk-shaped gliding toy.;a light, plastic disk about 10 inches in diameter, propelled with a flip of the wrist for recreation or competition;A Frisbee is a light plastic disc that one person throws to another as a game. ;used for a plastic disk for tossing between players;a round piece of plastic that you throw to another person in a game played outside;a brand of plastic concave disk, used for various catching games by sailing it between two or more players and thrown by making it spin as it is released with a flick of the wrist.;A trademark for a plastic disk-shaped toy that players throw and catch.;Trademark A concave plastic disc designed for skimming through the air as an outdoor game or amusement.;Power;0
Gel pen;A gel pen uses ink in which pigment is suspended in a water-based gel. Because the ink is thick and opaque, it shows up more clearly on slick surfaces than the typical inks used in ballpoint or felt tip pens. Gel pens can be used for many types of writing and illustration.;A pen which uses ink in which pigment is suspended in a water-based gel.;;;;;a smooth-writing pen that uses a pigmented, gel-based ink.;;;Precision;3
Glasses;Glasses, also known as eyeglasses or spectacles, are vision eyewear, consisting of glass or hard plastic lenses mounted in a frame that holds them in front of a person's eyes, typically utilizing a bridge over the nose and hinged arms (known as temples or temple pieces) which rest over the ears.;plural of glass;optical instrument consisting of a frame that holds a pair of lenses for correcting defective vision;a pair of lenses for correcting faulty vision, in a frame that rests on the bridge of the nose and hooks behind the ears;any of various amorphous materials formed from a melt by cooling to rigidity without crystallization: such as;an object that you wear in front of your eyes to help you see better. You usually get your glasses from an optician;a pair of lenses for correcting faulty vision, in a frame that rests on the bridge of the nose and hooks behind the earsAlso called: spectacles, eyeglasses;Any of a large class of materials with highly variable mechanical and optical properties that solidify from the molten state without crystallization, are typically made by silicates fusing with boric oxide, aluminum oxide, or phosphorus pentoxide, are generally hard, brittle, and transparent or translucent, and are considered to be supercooled liquids rather than true solids.;A pair of lenses set in a frame resting on the nose and ears, used to correct or assist defective eyesight.;Precision;2
Glue stick;Glue sticks are solid and hard adhesives in twist or push-up tubes. Users can apply glue by holding the open tube to keep their fingers clean and rubbing the exposed stick against a surface. In the UK the brand name Pritt Stick, is often used as a generic term for any glue stick. ;A solid adhesive in a twist- or push-up tube, most commonly seen in schools and offices.;;;;;;;A product in the form of a tube that contains a solid stick of adhesive.;Power;1
Golf ball;A golf ball is a special ball designed to be used in the game of golf.;A small, usually white ball that is designed for use in the game of golf.;;A golf ball is a small, hard white ball which people use when they are playing golf. ;a small hard dimpled ball used in golf;a small white ball used for playing golf;A pair of lenses set in a frame resting on the nose and ears, used to correct or assist defective eyesight.a small, white ball with a tough cover and a resilient core of rubber, used in playing golf.;A small hard dimpled ball used in golf.;A small hard ball used in the game of golf, typically made of dimpled white latex.;Precision;2
Hairbrush;A hairbrush is a handle brush with rigid or soft spokes used in hair care for smoothing, styling, and detangling human hair, or for grooming an animal's fur. It can also be used for styling in combination with a curling iron or hair dryer. A flat brush is normally used for detangling hair, for example after sleep or showering. A round brush can be used for styling and curling hair, especially by a professional stylist, often with a hair dryer. A paddle brush is used to straighten hair and tame fly-aways. For babies with fine, soft hair, many bristle materials are not suitable due to the hardness, some synthetic materials and horse/goat hair bristles are used instead.;A brush used in hair care for brushing, tidying, and detangling hair;a brush used to groom a person's hair;A hairbrush is a brush that you use to brush your hair. ;a brush for the hair;a brush for arranging hair and making it tidy;a brush for smoothing and styling the hair. ;A brush for the hair.;A brush for smoothing a person's hair.;Power;0
Hammer;A hammer is a tool, most often a hand tool, consisting of a weighted "head" fixed to a long handle that is swung to deliver an impact to a small area of an object. This can be, for example, to drive nails into wood, to shape metal (as with a forge), or to crush rock. Hammers are used for a wide range of driving, shaping, breaking and non-destructive striking applications. Traditional disciplines include carpentry, blacksmithing, warfare, and percussive musicianship (as with a gong).;A tool with a heavy head and a handle used for pounding.;the part of a gunlock that strikes the percussion cap when the trigger is pulled;A hammer is a tool that consists of a heavy piece of metal at the end of a handle. It is used, for example, to hit nails into a piece of wood or a wall, or to break things into pieces. ;a hand tool consisting of a solid head set crosswise on a handle and used for pounding;a tool used for hitting things or forcing nails into wood that consists of a handle and a heavy metal top with one flat side;a tool consisting of a solid head, usually of metal, set crosswise on a handle, used for beating metals, driving nails, etc.;A hand tool consisting of a handle with a head of metal or other heavy rigid material that is attached at a right angle, used for striking or pounding.;A tool with a heavy metal head mounted at right angles at the end of a handle, used for jobs such as breaking things and driving in nails.;Power;1
Handfan;A handheld fan, or simply hand fan, may be any broad, flat surface that is waved back-and-forth to create an airflow. Generally, purpose-made handheld fans are folding fans, which are shaped like a sector of a circle and made of a thin material (such as paper or feathers) mounted on slats which revolve around a pivot so that it can be closed when not in use.;A hand-held device designed to be waved back and forth in order to induce airflow for the purpose of cooling the user.;;;;;;;;Power;0
Jar;A jar is a rigid, cylindrical or slightly conical container, typically made of glass, ceramic, or plastic, with a wide mouth or opening that can be closed with a lid, screw cap, lug cap, cork stopper, roll-on cap, crimp-on cap, press-on cap, plastic shrink, heat sealed lidding film, an inner seal, a Tamper-evident band, or other suitable means.;An earthenware container, either with two or no handles, for holding oil, water, wine, etc., or used for burial.;a vessel (usually cylindrical) with a wide mouth and without handles;A jar is a glass container with a lid that is used for storing food. ;a widemouthed container made typically of earthenware or glass;a glass container with a lid and a wide top, especially one in which food is sold or kept;a broad-mouthed container, usually cylindrical and of glass or earthenware: ;A cylindrical glass or earthenware vessel with a wide mouth and usually no handles.;A wide-mouthed cylindrical container made of glass or pottery and typically having a lid, used especially for storing food.;Power;1
Jug;A jug is a type of container commonly used to hold liquids. It has an opening, sometimes narrow, from which to pour or drink, and has a handle, and often a pouring lip. Jugs throughout history have been made of metal, and ceramic, or glass, and plastic is now common. In British English, jugs are pouring vessels for holding drinkable liquids, whether beer, water or soft drinks, types of packaging for milk etc are not called jugs. In North American English these table jugs are usually called pitchers. Ewer is an older word for jugs or pitchers, and there are several others.;A serving vessel or container, typically circular in cross-section and typically higher than it is wide, with a relatively small mouth or spout, an ear handle and often a stopper or top.;a large bottle with a narrow mouth;A jug is a cylindrical container with a handle and is used for holding and pouring liquids. ;a large deep container (as of glass, earthenware, or plastic) with a narrow mouth and a handle;a container from which you pour liquids such as water or milk. The usual American word is pitcher;a large container usually made of earthenware, metal, or glass, commonly having a handle, a narrow neck, and sometimes a cap or cork.;A large, often rounded vessel of earthenware, glass, or metal with a small mouth, a handle, and usually a stopper or cap. The amount that a jug can hold.;A cylindrical container with a handle and a lip, used for holding and pouring liquids.;Power;1
Key;Key or The Key may refer to:;An object designed to open and close a lock.;metal device shaped in such a way that when it is inserted into the appropriate lock the lock's mechanism can be rotated;A key is a specially shaped piece of metal that you place in a lock and turn in order to open or lock a door, or to start or stop the engine of a vehicle. ;a usually metal instrument by which the bolt of a lock is turned;a small piece of metal used for opening or locking a door or a container, or for starting the engine of a vehicle;a small metal instrument specially cut to fit into a lock and move its bolt.;A notched and grooved, usually metal implement that is turned to open or close a lock.  A similar implement or an electronic device used for opening, winding, or starting something: the key of a wind-up alarm clock, the new car's electronic key. A device, such as a wedge or pin, inserted to lock together mechanical or structural parts.  A keycard.;A small piece of shaped metal with incisions cut to fit the wards of a particular lock, which is inserted into a lock and turned to open or close it.;Power;0
Kiwifruit;Kiwifruit (commonly shortened to kiwi in North America and continental Europe) or Chinese gooseberry is the edible berry of several species of woody vines in the genus "Actinidia". The most common cultivar group of kiwifruit ("Actinidia deliciosa" 'Hayward') is oval, about the size of a large hen's egg: in length and in diameter. It has a thin, fuzzy, fibrous, tart but edible light brown skin and light green or golden flesh with rows of tiny, black, edible seeds. The fruit has a soft texture with a sweet and unique flavour. In 2018, China produced half of the world total of kiwifruit.;Alternative spelling of kiwi fruit;;edible oval fruit of the kiwi plant ;the edible fruit of a Chinese gooseberry having a fuzzy brown skin and slightly acidic typically green flesh;;;A woody vine (Actinidia deliciosa) native to China, cultivated especially in New Zealand for its edible fruit.;;Precision;2
Knife;A knife (plural knives, from Old Norse 'knife, dirk') is a tool or weapon with a cutting edge or blade, often attached to a handle or hilt. One of the earliest tools used by humanity, knives appeared at least 2.5 million years ago, as evidenced by the Oldowan tools. Originally made of wood, bone, and stone (such as flint and obsidian), over the centuries, in step with improvements in both metallurgy and manufacturing, knife blades have been made from copper, bronze, iron, steel, ceramic, and titanium. Most modern knives have either fixed or folding blades, blade patterns and styles vary by maker and country of origin.;A utensil or a tool designed for cutting, consisting of a flat piece of hard material, usually steel or other metal (the blade), usually sharpened on one edge, attached to a handle. The blade may be pointed for piercing.;edge tool used as a cutting instrument, has a pointed blade with a sharp edge and a handle;A knife is a tool for cutting or a weapon and consists of a flat piece of metal with a sharp edge on the end of a handle.;a cutting instrument consisting of a sharp blade fastened to a handle;an object with a sharp blade for cutting food;an instrument for cutting, consisting essentially of a thin, sharp-edged, metal blade fitted with a handle.;A cutting instrument consisting of a sharp blade attached to a handle. A cutting edge, a blade.;An instrument composed of a blade fixed into a handle, used for cutting or as a weapon.;Precision;3
Ladle;Ladle may refer to: ;A deep-bowled spoon with a long, usually curved, handle.;a spoon-shaped vessel with a long handle, frequently used to transfer liquids from one container to another;A ladle is a large, round, deep spoon with a long handle, used for serving soup, stew, or sauce.;a deep-bowled long-handled spoon used especially for dipping up and conveying liquids;a large deep spoon with a long handle, used for serving liquid food such as soup;a long-handled utensil with a cup-shaped bowl for dipping or conveying liquids.;A long-handled spoon with a deep bowl for serving liquids.;A large long-handled spoon with a cup-shaped bowl, used for serving soup or sauce.;Precision;3
Lemon;The lemon ("Citrus limon") is a species of small evergreen tree in the flowering plant family Rutaceae, native to Asia, primarily Northeast India (Assam), Northern Myanmar or China.;A yellowish citrus fruit.;yellow oval fruit with juicy acidic flesh;A lemon is a bright yellow fruit with very sour juice. Lemons grow on trees in warm countries. ;an acid fruit that is botanically a many-seeded pale yellow oblong berry produced by a small thorny citrus tree (Citrus limon) and that has a rind from which an aromatic oil is extracted;fruit with a hard yellow skin and sour juice. It grows on a lemon tree. Lemons are citrus fruits;the yellowish, acid fruit of a subtropical citrus tree, Citrus limon.;A spiny evergreen tree (Citrus limon) native to Asia, widely cultivated for its oval yellow fruit. The fruit of this tree, having an aromatic rind and juicy, acid pulp.;A pale yellow oval citrus fruit with thick skin and fragrant, acidic juice.;Power;1
Lollipop;A lollipop is a type of sugar candy usually consisting of hard candy mounted on a stick and intended for sucking or licking. Different informal terms are used in different places, including lolly, sucker, sticky-pop, etc. Lollipops are available in many flavors and shapes.;An item of confectionery consisting of a piece of candy/sweet attached to a stick.;ice cream or water ice on a small wooden stick;A lollipop is a sweet consisting of a hard disc or ball of a sugary substance on the end of a stick. ;a piece of hard candy on the end of a stick;a hard sweet on the end of a stick;a piece of hard candy attached to the end of a small stick that is held in the hand while the candy is licked.;A confection consisting of a piece of hard candy attached to the end of a small stick.;A large, flat, rounded boiled sweet on the end of a stick.;Precision;3
Marble;Marble is a metamorphic rock composed of recrystallized carbonate minerals, most commonly calcite or dolomite. Marble is typically not foliated, although there are exceptions. In geology, the term "marble" refers to metamorphosed limestone, but its use in stonemasonry more broadly encompasses unmetamorphosed limestone. Marble is commonly used for sculpture and as a building material.;A rock of crystalline limestone.;a hard crystalline metamorphic rock that takes a high polish, used for sculpture and as building material;Marble is a type of very hard rock which feels cold when you touch it and which shines when it is cut and polished. Statues and parts of buildings are sometimes made of marble. ;limestone that is more or less crystallized by metamorphism, that ranges from granular to compact in texture, that is capable of taking a high polish, and that is used especially in architecture and sculpture;a hard smooth stone used for building and making statues. Marble is usually white with dark lines that are not regular in shape;metamorphosed limestone, consisting chiefly of recrystallized calcite or dolomite, capable of taking a high polish, occurring in a wide range of colors and variegations and used in sculpture and architecture.;A metamorphic rock formed by alteration of limestone or dolomite, often irregularly colored by impurities, and used especially in architecture and sculpture. A piece of this rock. A sculpture made from this rock.;A hard crystalline metamorphic form of limestone, typically white with coloured mottlings or streaks, which may be polished and is used in sculpture and architecture.;Precision;2
Marker Pen;A marker pen, fine liner, marking pen, felt-tip pen, flow marker, sign pen (in South Korea), vivid (in New Zealand), texta (in Australia), sketch pen (in South Asia) or koki (in South Africa), is a pen which has its own ink source and a tip made of porous, pressed fibers such as felt.;A pen, often with a thick tip made of felt.;;a pen with a thick tip made of felt ;;;;;;Precision;3
Mobile phone;A mobile phone, cellular phone, cell phone, cellphone, handphone, or hand phone, sometimes shortened to simply mobile, cell or just phone, is a portable telephone that can make and receive calls over a radio frequency link while the user is moving within a telephone service area. The radio frequency link establishes a connection to the switching systems of a mobile phone operator, which provides access to the public switched telephone network (PSTN). Modern mobile telephone services use a cellular network architecture and, therefore, mobile telephones are called "cellular telephones" or "cell phones" in North America. In addition to telephony, digital mobile phones (2G) support a variety of other services, such as text messaging, MMS, email, Internet access, short-range wireless communications (infrared, Bluetooth), business applications, video games and digital photography. Mobile phones offering only those capabilities are known as feature phones, mobile phones which offer greatly advanced computing capabilities are referred to as smartphones.;A portable telephone that connects with the telephone network over radio wave transmission.;;A mobile phone is a phone that you can carry with you and use to make or receive calls wherever you are.;;a small phone that you can carry around with you. The usual American word is cell phone.;any wireless telephone that operates over a relatively large area, as a cell phone or PCS phone.;See cellphone.;A telephone with access to a cellular radio system so it can be used over a wide area, without a physical connection to a network.;Power;0
Mousepad;A mousepad is a surface for placing and moving a computer mouse. A mousepad enhances the usability of the mouse compared to using a mouse directly on a table by providing a surface to allow it to measure movement accurately and without jitter. Some mousepads increase ergonomics by providing a padded wrist rest, although the benefits of this are debatable.;Alternative spelling of mouse pad;a small portable pad that provides traction for the ball of a computer mouse;another name for mousemat;a thin flat pad (as of rubber) on which a computer mouse is used;the flat part on a laptop that you operate with your fingers to do things on a computer screen;a small, typically foam rubber sheet used to provide a stable surface on which a mouse can be moved.;A flat pad, as of specially coated foam rubber, designed to provide an optimum surface on which to use a mouse.;A piece of rigid or slightly resilient material on which a computer mouse is moved.;Power;0
Mug;A mug is a type of cup typically used for drinking hot drinks, such as coffee, hot chocolate, or tea. Mugs usually have handles and hold a larger amount of fluid than other types of cup. Typically, a mug holds approximately of liquid. A mug is a less formal style of drink container and is not usually used in formal place settings, where a teacup or coffee cup is preferred. Shaving mugs are used to assist in wet shaving.;A large cup for hot liquids, usually having a handle and used without a saucer.;the quantity that can be held in a mug;A mug is a large deep cup with straight sides and a handle, used for hot drinks. ;a cylindrical drinking cup;a cup with straight sides and no saucer, used mainly for hot drinks;a drinking cup, usually cylindrical in shape, having a handle, and often of a heavy substance, as earthenware.;A heavy cylindrical drinking cup usually having a handle.;A large cup, typically cylindrical with a handle and used without a saucer.;Power;1
Newspaper;A newspaper is a periodical publication containing written information about current events and is often typed in black ink with a white or gray background.;A publication, usually published daily or weekly and usually printed on cheap, low-quality paper, containing news and other articles.;a daily or weekly publication on folded sheets, contains news and articles and advertisements;A newspaper is a publication consisting of a number of large sheets of folded paper, on which news, advertisements, and other information is printed. ;a paper that is printed and distributed usually daily or weekly and that contains news, articles of opinion, features, and advertising;a set of large printed sheets of folded paper containing news, articles, and other information, usually published every day. There are two main types of newspaper, the quality or broadsheet newspapers that generally deal with serious news issues, and the tabloid newspapers that deal more with subjects such as sport, television actors, and shocking crime stories. A newspaper is usually simply called a paper;a printed publication issued at regular and usually close intervals, especially daily or weekly, and commonly containing news, comment, features, and advertising: ;A publication, usually issued daily or weekly, containing current news, editorials, feature articles, and usually advertising.;A printed publication (usually issued daily or weekly) consisting of folded unstapled sheets and containing news, articles, advertisements, and correspondence.;Power;0
Notepad;; A pad of paper, often bound, in which one jots down notes, a notebook.;a pad of paper for keeping notes;A notepad is a pad of paper that you use for writing notes or letters on. ;;several sheets of paper joined together along one edge, used for writing notes;a pad of blank pages for writing notes. ;A pad or tablet of usually lined paper.;A pad of blank or ruled pages for writing notes on.;Power;0
Onion;The onion ("Allium cepa" L., from Latin "cepa" "onion"), also known as the bulb onion or common onion, is a vegetable that is the most widely cultivated species of the genus "Allium". The shallot is a botanical variety of the onion. Until 2010, the shallot was classified as a separate species.;A monocotyledonous plant (Allium cepa), allied to garlic, used as vegetable and spice.;the bulb of an onion plant;An onion is a round vegetable with a brown skin that grows underground. It has many white layers on its inside which have a strong, sharp smell and taste. ;a widely cultivated Asian herb (Allium cepa) of the lily family with pungent edible bulbs;a round vegetable with thin dry skin and many layers inside that tastes and smells very strong;a plant, Allium cepa, of the amaryllis family, having an edible, succulent, pungent bulb.;A bulbous plant (Allium cepa) cultivated worldwide as a vegetable. The rounded edible bulb of this plant, composed of fleshy, tight, concentric leaf bases having a pungent odor and taste.;A swollen edible bulb used as a vegetable, having a pungent taste and smell and composed of several concentric layers.;Power;1
Paintbrush;A paintbrush is a brush used to apply paint or sometimes ink. A paintbrush is usually made by clamping the bristles to a handle with a ferrule. They are available in various sizes, shapes, and materials. Thicker ones are used for filling in, and thinner ones are used for details. They may be subdivided into decorators' brushes used for painting and decorating and artists' brushes use for visual art.;A thin brush for applying paint.;a brush used as an applicator (to apply paint);A paintbrush is a brush which you use for painting. ;a brush for applying paint;a brush used for putting paint on a surface or for making a picture with paints;a brush for applying paint, as one used in painting houses or one used in painting pictures.;A brush for applying paint.;A brush for applying paint.;Precision;3
Pan;Pan may refer to:;Ellipsis of Peter Pan;cooking utensil consisting of a wide metal vessel;A pan is a round metal container with a long handle, which is used for cooking things in, usually on top of a cooker or stove.;a usually broad, shallow, and open container for domestic use (as for cooking);a round metal container used for cooking, with a handle and usually a lid. A saucepan has tall sides and a frying pan is wider with shorter sides and usually no lid;a broad, shallow container of metal, usually having sides flaring outward toward the top, used in various forms for frying, baking, washing, etc.;A shallow, wide, open container, usually of metal and without a lid, used for holding liquids, cooking, and other domestic purposes.;A metal container used for cooking food in.;Power;0
Peach;The peach ("Prunus persica") is a deciduous tree native to the region of Northwest China between the Tarim Basin and the north slopes of the Kunlun Mountains, where it was first domesticated and cultivated. It bears edible juicy fruits with various characteristics, most called peaches and others (the glossy-skinned varieties), nectarines.;A tree (Prunus persica), native to China and now widely cultivated throughout temperate regions, having pink flowers and edible fruit.;cultivated in temperate regions;A peach is a soft, round, slightly furry fruit with sweet yellow flesh and pinky-orange skin. Peaches grow in warm countries.;a low spreading freely branching Chinese tree (Prunus persica) of the rose family that has lanceolate leaves and sessile usually pink flowers and is widely cultivated in temperate areas for its edible fruit which is a single-seeded drupe with a hard central stone, a pulpy white or yellow flesh, and a thin fuzzy skin;a fruit with a furry yellowish-pink skin that is yellow inside and has a large hard seed. It grows on a peach tree.;the subacid, juicy, drupaceous fruit of a tree, Prunus persica, of the rose family.;A small Chinese tree (Prunus persica) in the rose family, widely cultivated throughout temperate regions, having pink flowers and edible fruit. The soft juicy fruit of this tree, having yellow or white flesh, downy reddish-yellow skin, and a deeply ridged stone containing a single seed.;A round stone fruit with juicy yellow flesh and downy pinkish-yellow skin.;Power;1
Pear;Pears are fruits produced and consumed around the world, growing on a tree and harvested in the Northern Hemisphere in late summer into October. The pear tree and shrub are a species of genus Pyrus , in the family Rosaceae, bearing the pomaceous fruit of the same name. Several species of pears are valued for their edible fruit and juices, while others are cultivated as trees.;An edible fruit produced by the pear tree, similar to an apple but elongated towards the stem.;sweet juicy gritty-textured fruit available in many varieties;A pear is a sweet, juicy fruit which is narrow near its stalk, and wider and rounded at the bottom. Pears have white flesh and thin green or yellow skin. ;a pome fruit of a tree (genus Pyrus, especially P. communis) of the rose family that typically has a pale green or brownish skin, a firm juicy flesh, and an oblong shape in which a broad base end tapers upward to a narrow stem end;a fruit that is smaller towards the stem end, is white inside, and has yellow, green, or brown skin. It grows on a pear tree.;the edible fruit, typically rounded but elongated and growing smaller toward the stem, of a tree, Pyrus communis, of the rose family. ;Any of several trees of the genus Pyrus in the rose family, having glossy leaves and white flowers, especially P. communis, widely cultivated for its edible fruit.;A yellowish- or brownish-green edible fruit that is typically narrow at the stalk and wider towards the base, with sweet, slightly gritty flesh.;Power;1
Pencil;A pencil is a writing or drawing implement with a solid pigment core encased in a sleeve, barrel, or shaft that prevents breaking the core or marking a user's hand.;A paintbrush.;a thin cylindrical pointed writing implement, a rod of marking substance encased in wood;A pencil is an object that you write or draw with. It consists of a thin piece of wood with a rod of a black or coloured substance through the middle. If you write or draw something in pencil, you do it using a pencil.;an artist's brush;a long thin object, usually made of wood, that you use for writing or drawing by pressing the black or coloured part in its centre against paper or some other surface;a slender tube of wood, metal, plastic, etc., containing a core or strip of graphite, a solid coloring material, or the like, used for writing or drawing.;A narrow, generally cylindrical implement for writing, drawing, or marking, consisting of a thin rod of graphite, colored wax, or similar substance encased in wood or held in a mechanical holder.;An instrument for writing or drawing, consisting of a thin stick of graphite or a similar substance enclosed in a long thin piece of wood or fixed in a cylindrical case.;Precision;3
Pill;Pill or The Pill may refer to:;A small, usually round or cylindrical object designed for easy swallowing, usually containing some sort of medication.;something that resembles a tablet of medicine in shape or size;Pills are small solid round masses of medicine or vitamins that you swallow without chewing. ;a usually medicinal or dietary preparation in a small rounded mass to be swallowed whole;a small piece of solid medicine that you swallow with water;a small globular or rounded mass of medicinal substance, usually covered with a hard coating, that is to be swallowed whole.;A small pellet or tablet of medicine, often coated, taken by swallowing whole or by chewing.;A small round mass of solid medicine for swallowing whole.;Precision;2
Pliers;Pliers are a hand tool used to hold objects firmly, possibly developed from tongs used to handle hot metal in Bronze Age Europe. They are also useful for bending and compressing a wide range of materials. Generally, pliers consist of a pair of metal first-class levers joined at a fulcrum positioned closer to one end of the levers, creating short "jaws" on one side of the fulcrum, and longer "handles" on the other side. This arrangement creates a mechanical advantage, allowing the force of the hand's grip to be amplified and focused on an object with precision. The jaws can also be used to manipulate objects too small or unwieldy to be manipulated with the fingers.;A pincer-like gripping tool that multiplies the strength of the user's hand, often used for bending things.;a gripping hand tool with two hinged arms and (usually) serrated jaws; Pliers are a tool with two handles at one end and two hard, flat, metal parts at the other. Pliers are used for holding or pulling out things such as nails, or for bending or cutting wire.;a small pincers for holding small objects or for bending and cutting wire;a metal tool that looks like a strong pair of scissors, used for holding small objects or for bending or cutting wire;a gripping tool consisting of two hinged arms with usually serrated jaws that close on the workpiece;One who plies a trade.;Pincers with parallel, flat, and typically serrated surfaces, used chiefly for gripping small objects or bending wire.;Power;1
Plate;Plate may refer to:;A slightly curved but almost flat dish from which food is served or eaten.;(baseball) base consisting of a rubber slab where the batter stands, it must be touched by a base runner in order to score;A plate is a round or oval flat dish that is used to hold food. ;a smooth flat thin piece of material;a flat round dish that you put food on;a shallow, usually circular dish, often of earthenware or porcelain, from which food is eaten.;A smooth, flat, relatively thin, rigid body of uniform thickness.;A flat dish, typically circular and made of china, from which food is eaten or served.;Power;0
Playing card;A playing card is a piece of specially prepared card stock, heavy paper, thin cardboard, plastic-coated paper, cotton-paper blend, or thin plastic that is marked with distinguishing motifs. Often the front (face) and back of each card has a finish to make handling easier. They are most commonly used for playing card games, and are also used in magic tricks, cardistry, card throwing, and card houses, cards may also be collected. Some patterns of Tarot playing card are also used for divination, although bespoke cards for this use are more common. Playing cards are typically palm-sized for convenient handling, and usually are sold together in a set as a deck of cards or pack of cards.;Any of the usually 52 rectangular pieces of card used to play numerous games, featuring either one to 10 pips or a picture and belonging of one of four suits.;;Playing cards are thin pieces of cardboard with numbers or pictures printed on them, which are used to play various games. ;one of a set of 24 to 78 thin rectangular pieces of cardboard or plastic marked on one side to show its rank and suit and used in playing any of numerous games;a card used for playing card games;one of the conventional set of 52 cards in four suits, as diamonds, hearts, spades, and clubs, used in playing various games of chance and skill.;A card marked with its rank and suit and belonging to any of several decks used in playing various games.;Each of a set of rectangular pieces of card having a sequence of numbers and symbols on one side, used to play various games, some involving gambling. A standard pack contains 52 cards divided into four suits.;Power;0
Potato;The potato is a starchy tuber of the plant Solanum tuberosum and is a root vegetable native to the Americas, with the plant itself being a perennial in the nightshade family Solanaceae.;The tuber of a plant, Solanum tuberosum, eaten as a starchy vegetable, particularly in the Americas and Europe, this plant.;an edible tuber native to South America, a staple food of Ireland;Potatoes are quite round vegetables with brown or red skins and white insides. They grow under the ground. ;sweet potato;a very common hard round vegetable that has a brown, red, or yellow skin and is white or yellow inside. It grows under the ground and can be cooked in many different ways;Also called Irish potato, white potato. the edible tuber of a cultivated plant, Solanum tuberosum, of the nightshade family. ;perennial plant (Solanum tuberosum) in the nightshade family that was first cultivated in South America and is widely grown for its starchy edible tubers. A tuber of this plant.;A starchy plant tuber which is one of the most important food crops, cooked and eaten as a vegetable.;Power;1
Potato chip;A potato chip (often just chip, or crisp in British and Irish English) is a thin slice of potato that has been either deep fried or baked until crunchy. They are commonly served as a snack, side dish, or appetizer. The basic chips are cooked and salted, additional varieties are manufactured using various flavorings and ingredients including herbs, spices, cheeses, other natural flavors, artificial flavors, and additives.;One of a batch of pieces of potato cut into elongated cubes and fried, a chip or chipped potato, usually larger than American french fries.;;Potato chips are very thin slices of potato that have been fried until they are hard, dry, and crisp, and are eaten cold as a snack. ;a thin slice of white potato that has been cooked until crisp and then usually salted;a crisp;a thin slice of potato fried until crisp and usually salted.;A thin slice of potato fried in deep fat until crisp and then usually seasoned: ate potato chips while we watched the movie.;A wafer-thin slice of potato fried or baked until crisp and eaten as a snack, a crisp.;Power;0
Quill;A quill is a writing tool made from a moulted flight feather (preferably a primary wing-feather) of a large bird. Quills were used for writing with ink before the invention of the dip pen, the metal-nibbed pen, the fountain pen, and, eventually, the ballpoint pen.;The lower shaft of a feather, specifically the region lacking barbs.;pen made from a bird's feather;A quill is a pen made from a bird's feather. ;a bobbin, spool, or spindle on which filling yarn is wound;an old-fashioned pen made from a bird’s feather;one of the large feathers of the wing or tail of a bird.;The hollow stemlike main shaft of a feather. Also called calamus.;Any of the main wing or tail feathers of a bird.;Precision;3
Remote control;In electronics, a remote control or clicker is an electronic device used to operate another device from a distance, usually wirelessly. In consumer electronics, a remote control can be used to operate devices such as a television set, DVD player or other home appliance. A remote control can allow operation of devices that are out of convenient reach for direct operation of controls. They function best when used from a short distance. This is primarily a convenience feature for the user. In some cases, remote controls allow a person to operate a device that they otherwise would not be able to reach, as when a garage door opener is triggered from outside.;A device used to operate an appliance (such as a television, vehicle, or mechanical toy) from a short distance away.;;Remote control is a system of controlling a machine or a vehicle from a distance by using radio or electronic signals.;control (as by radio signal) of operation from a point at some distance removed;a piece of equipment that you use for controlling a machine such as a television or stereo system from a short distance away;control of the operation or performance of an apparatus from a distance, as the control of a guided missile by radio signals.;The control of an activity, process, or machine from a distance, as by radioed instructions or coded signals.;Control of a machine or apparatus from a distance by means of radio or infrared signals transmitted from a device.;Power;0
Rubik's Cube;The Rubik's Cube is a 3-D combination puzzle invented in 1974 by Hungarian sculptor and professor of architecture Ernő Rubik. Originally called the Magic Cube, the puzzle was licensed by Rubik to be sold by Ideal Toy Corp. in 1980 via businessman Tibor Laczi and Seven Towns founder Tom Kremer. Rubik's Cube won the 1980 German Game of the Year special award for Best Puzzle. , 350 million cubes had been sold worldwide, making it the world's bestselling puzzle game and bestselling toy.;;;a puzzle consisting of a cube with colored faces made of 26 smaller colored blocks attached to a spindle in the center, the object being to rotate the blocks until each face of the cube is a single color;;a puzzle in the form of a box with nine different coloured squares on each side. You have to move its parts so that each side shows only one colour.;a puzzle consisting of a cube with colored faces made of 26 smaller colored blocks attached to a spindle in the center, the object being to rotate the blocks until each face of the cube is a single color.;;A puzzle in the form of a plastic cube covered with multicoloured squares, which the player attempts to twist and turn so that all the squares on each face are of the same colour.;Power;1
Scalpel;A scalpel, or lancet, or bistoury, is a small and extremely sharp bladed instrument used for surgery, anatomical dissection, podiatry and various arts and crafts (called a hobby knife). Scalpels may be single-use disposable or re-usable. Re-usable scalpels can have permanently attached blades that can be sharpened or, more commonly, removable single-use blades. Disposable scalpels usually have a plastic handle with an extensible blade (like a utility knife) and are used once, then the entire instrument is discarded. Scalpel blades are usually individually packed in sterile pouches but are also offered non-sterile. Double-edged scalpels are referred to as "lancets".;A small straight knife with a very sharp blade used for surgery, dissection and craftwork.;a thin straight surgical knife used in dissection and surgery;A scalpel is a knife with a short, thin, sharp blade. Scalpels are used by surgeons during operations. ;a small straight thin-bladed knife used especially in surgery;a small sharp knife used by a doctor for doing an operation;a small, light, usually straight knife used in surgical and anatomical operations and dissections.;A small straight knife with a thin sharp blade used in surgery and dissection.;A knife with a small, sharp, sometimes detachable blade, as used by a surgeon.;Precision;3
Scissors;Scissors are hand-operated shearing tools. A pair of scissors consists of a pair of metal blades pivoted so that the sharpened edges slide against each other when the handles (bows) opposite to the pivot are closed. Scissors are used for cutting various thin materials, such as paper, cardboard, metal foil, cloth, rope, and wire. A large variety of scissors and shears all exist for specialized purposes. Hair-cutting shears and kitchen shears are functionally equivalent to scissors, but the larger implements tend to be called shears. Hair-cutting shears have specific blade angles ideal for cutting hair. Using the incorrect type of scissors to cut hair will result in increased damage or split ends, or both, by breaking the hair. Kitchen shears, also known as kitchen scissors, are intended for cutting and trimming foods such as meats.;A tool used for cutting thin material, consisting of two crossing blades attached at a pivot point in such a way that the blades slide across each other when the handles are closed.;an edge tool having two crossed pivoting blades;Scissors are a small cutting tool with two sharp blades that are screwed together. You use scissors for cutting things such as paper and cloth. ;a cutting instrument having two blades whose cutting edges slide past each other;a tool for cutting paper, consisting of two blades joined in a cross that you open and shut like jaws;(used with a singular or plural verb) a cutting instrument for paper, cloth, etc., consisting of two blades, each having a ring-shaped handle, that are so pivoted together that their sharp edges work one against the other (often used with pair of).;scissors (used with a sing. or pl. verb) A cutting implement consisting of two blades joined by a swivel pin that allows the cutting edges to be opened and closed.;An instrument used for cutting cloth, paper, and other material, consisting of two blades laid one on top of the other and fastened in the middle so as to allow them to be opened and closed by a thumb and finger inserted through rings on the end of their handles.;Precision;3
Screw;A screw and a bolt (see "Differentiation between bolt and screw" below) are similar types of fastener typically made of metal and characterized by a helical ridge, called a "male thread" (external thread). Screws and bolts are used to fasten materials by the engagement of the screw thread with a similar "female thread" (internal thread) in the matching part. ;A device that has a helical function.;someone who guards prisoners;A screw is a metal object similar to a nail, with a raised spiral line around it. You turn a screw using a screwdriver so that it goes through two things, for example two pieces of wood, and fastens them together. ;a simple machine of the inclined plane type consisting of a spirally grooved solid cylinder and a correspondingly grooved hollow cylinder into which it fits;a thin pointed piece of metal that is used for fastening one thing to another. It has a raised twisted part on it called a thread. You push and turn it with a screwdriver instead of hitting it with a hammer like a nail;a metal fastener having a tapered shank with a helical thread, and topped with a slotted head, driven into wood or the like by rotating, especially by means of a screwdriver.;A cylindrical rod incised with one or more helical or advancing spiral threads, as a lead screw or worm screw. The tapped collar or socket that receives this rod.;A short, slender, sharp-pointed metal pin with a raised helical thread running round it and a slotted head, used to join things together by being rotated so that it pierces wood or other material and is held tightly in place.;Precision;2
Screwdriver;A screwdriver is a tool, manual or powered, used for driving screws. A typical simple screwdriver has a handle and a shaft, ending in a tip the user puts into the screw head before turning the handle. This form of the screwdriver has been replaced in many workplaces and homes with a more modern and versatile tool, a power drill, as they are quicker, easier, and also can drill holes. The shaft is usually made of tough steel to resist bending or twisting. The tip may be hardened to resist wear, treated with a dark tip coating for improved visual contrast between tip and screw—or ridged or treated for additional 'grip'. Handles are typically wood, metal, or plastic and usually hexagonal, square, or oval in cross-section to improve grip and prevent the tool from rolling when set down. Some manual screwdrivers have interchangeable tips that fit into a socket on the end of the shaft and are held in mechanically or magnetically. These often have a hollow handle that contains various types and sizes of tips, and a reversible ratchet action that allows multiple full turns without repositioning the tip or the user's hand.;A hand or machine tool which engages with the head of a screw and allows torque to be applied to turn the screw, thus driving it in or loosening it.;a hand tool for driving screws, has a tip that fits into the head of a screw;A screwdriver is a tool that is used for turning screws. It consists of a metal rod with a flat or cross-shaped end that fits into the top of the screw. ;a tool for turning screws;a tool used for turning screws;a hand tool for turning a screw, consisting of a handle attached to a long, narrow shank, usually of metal, which tapers and flattens out to a tip that fits into the slotted head of a screw. ;A tool used for turning screws.;A tool with a flattened or cross-shaped tip that fits into the head of a screw to turn it.;Precision;3
Sheet of paper;;A single piece of loose paper, which, when bound in a book or booklet, consists of two pages (one on the front and one on the back).;;;;;;;;Power;0
Spatula;A spatula is a broad, flat, flexible blade used to mix, spread and lift material including foods, drugs, plaster and paints.;A kitchen utensil consisting of a flat surface attached to a long handle, used for turning, lifting, or stirring food.;a turner with a narrow flexible blade;;a flat thin implement used especially for spreading or mixing soft substances, scooping, or lifting;a kitchen tool with a handle at one end and a wide flat part at the other for lifting hot foods or for spreading soft substances;an implement with a broad, flat, usually flexible blade, used for blending foods or removing them from cooking utensils, mixing drugs, spreading plasters and paints, etc.;A small implement having a straight handle and a broad, flexible blade that is used to mix or spread semiliquid substances: used a spatula to apply the joint compound.;An implement with a broad, flat, blunt blade, used for mixing and spreading things, especially in cooking and painting.;Power;0
Sponge;Sponges, the members of the phylum Porifera (, meaning 'pore bearer'), are a basal animal clade as a sister of the Diploblasts. They are multicellular organisms that have bodies full of pores and channels allowing water to circulate through them, consisting of jelly-like mesohyl sandwiched between two thin layers of cells. The branch of zoology that studies sponges is known as spongiology.;Any of various marine invertebrates, mostly of the phylum Porifera, that have a porous skeleton often of silica.;a porous mass of interlacing fibers that forms the internal skeleton of various marine animals and usable to absorb water or any porous rubber or cellulose product similarly used;Sponge is a very light soft substance with lots of little holes in it, which can be either artificial or natural. It is used to clean things or as a soft layer. ;an elastic porous mass of interlacing horny fibers that forms the internal skeleton of various marine animals (phylum Porifera) and is able when wetted to absorb water;a piece of a soft artificial or natural substance that is used for taking liquid into itself, for cleaning things, or for washing yourself;any aquatic, chiefly marine animal of the phylum Porifera, having a porous structure and usually a horny, siliceous or calcareous internal skeleton or framework, occurring in large, sessile colonies.;Any of numerous aquatic, chiefly marine filter-feeding invertebrate animals of the phylum Porifera, characteristically having a porous skeleton composed of fibrous material or siliceous or calcareous spicules and often forming colonies attached to an underwater surface. Also called poriferan.  A piece of the absorbent skeleton of certain of these organisms, or a piece of plastic or another material that is similar in absorbency, used for cleaning, bathing, and other purposes.;A primitive sedentary aquatic invertebrate with a soft porous body that is typically supported by a framework of fibres or calcareous or glassy spicules. Sponges draw in a current of water to extract nutrients and oxygen.;Precision;2
Spoon;A spoon is a utensil consisting of a small shallow bowl (also known as a head), oval or round, at the end of a handle. A type of cutlery (sometimes called flatware in the United States), especially as part of a place setting, it is used primarily for transferring food to the mouth. Spoons are also used in food preparation to measure, mix, stir and toss ingredients and for serving food. Present day spoons are made from metal (notably flat silver or silverware, plated or solid), wood, porcelain or plastic. There are a wide variety of spoons that are made of a variety of materials and by different cultures for many different uses and foods.;An implement for eating or serving, a scooped utensil whose long handle is straight, in contrast to a ladle.;a piece of cutlery with a shallow bowl-shaped container and a handle, used to stir or serve or take up food;A spoon is an object used for eating, stirring, and serving food. One end of it is shaped like a shallow bowl and it has a long handle. ;an eating or cooking implement consisting of a small shallow bowl with a relatively long handle;an object used for eating soup and other liquid foods and for mixing and preparing food;a utensil for use in eating, stirring, measuring, ladling, etc., consisting of a small, shallow bowl with a handle.;A utensil consisting of a small, shallow bowl on a handle, used in preparing, serving, or eating food.;An implement consisting of a small, shallow oval or round bowl on a long handle, used for eating, stirring, and serving food.;Precision;3
Strawberry;The garden strawberry (or simply strawberry, "Fragaria × ananassa") is a widely grown hybrid species of the genus "Fragaria", collectively known as the strawberries, which are cultivated worldwide for their fruit. The fruit is widely appreciated for its characteristic aroma, bright red color, juicy texture, and sweetness. It is consumed in large quantities, either fresh or in such prepared foods as jam, juice, pies, ice cream, milkshakes, and chocolates. Artificial strawberry flavorings and aromas are also widely used in products such as candy, soap, lip gloss, perfume, and many others.;The sweet, usually red, edible fruit of certain plants of the genus Fragaria.;sweet fleshy red fruit;A strawberry is a small red fruit which is soft and juicy and has tiny yellow seeds on its skin. ;the juicy edible usually red fruit of any of several low-growing temperate herbs (genus Fragaria) of the rose family that is technically an enlarged pulpy receptacle bearing numerous achenes on its surface;a small soft red fruit with a lot of very small seeds on its skin;the fruit of any stemless plant belonging to the genus Fragaria, of the rose family, consisting of an enlarged fleshy receptacle bearing achenes on its exterior.;Any of various low-growing plants of the genus Fragaria of the rose family, having white flowers and an aggregate fruit that consists of numerous one-seeded achenes embedded in a fleshy red receptacle.;A sweet soft red fruit with a seed-studded surface.;Precision;2
Syringe;A syringe is a simple reciprocating pump consisting of a plunger (though in modern syringes, it is actually a piston) that fits tightly within a cylindrical tube called a barrel. The plunger can be linearly pulled and pushed along the inside of the tube, allowing the syringe to take in and expel liquid or gas through a discharge orifice at the front (open) end of the tube. The open end of the syringe may be fitted with a hypodermic needle, a nozzle or tubing to direct the flow into and out of the barrel. Syringes are frequently used in clinical medicine to administer injections, infuse intravenous therapy into the bloodstream, apply compounds such as glue or lubricant, and draw/measure liquids.;A device used for injecting or drawing fluids through a membrane.;a medical instrument used to inject or withdraw fluids;A syringe is a small tube with a thin hollow needle at the end. Syringes are used for putting liquids into things and for taking liquids out, for example for injecting drugs or for taking blood from someone's body. ;a device that consists of a nozzle of varying length and a compressible rubber bulb and is used for injection or irrigation;a needle fitted to a plastic tube, used for taking blood from your body or for putting medicine or drugs into it;a small device consisting of a glass, metal, or hard rubber tube, narrowed at its outlet, and fitted with either a piston or a rubber bulb for drawing in a quantity of fluid or for ejecting fluid in a stream, for cleaning wounds, injecting fluids into the body, etc.;A medical instrument used to inject fluids into the body or draw them from it.;A tube with a nozzle and piston or bulb for sucking in and ejecting liquid in a thin stream, used for cleaning wounds or body cavities, or fitted with a hollow needle for injecting or withdrawing fluids.;Precision;3
Tennis ball;A tennis ball is a ball designed for the sport of tennis. Tennis balls are fluorescent yellow in organised competitions, but in recreational play can be virtually any color. Tennis balls are covered in a fibrous felt which modifies their aerodynamic properties, and each has a white curvilinear oval covering it.;A hollow, bouncy rubber ball, pressurized and covered with usually yellow felt, used in the game of tennis.;;a hollow rubber ball covered with felt, used in tennis;a ball used in tennis that is made of rubber covered with felt and weighs about two ounces;;a hollow ball used in tennis, made of rubber with a fuzzy covering of woven Dacron, nylon, or wool.;;;Precision;2
Thermometer;A thermometer is a device that measures temperature or a temperature gradient (the degree of hotness or coldness of an object). A thermometer has two important elements: (1) a temperature sensor (e.g. the bulb of a mercury-in-glass thermometer or the pyrometric sensor in an infrared thermometer) in which some change occurs with a change in temperature, and (2) some means of converting this change into a numerical value (e.g. the visible scale that is marked on a mercury-in-glass thermometer or the digital readout on an infrared model). Thermometers are widely used in technology and industry to monitor processes, in meteorology, in medicine, and in scientific research.;An apparatus used to measure temperature.;measuring instrument for measuring temperature;A thermometer is an instrument for measuring temperature. It usually consists of a narrow glass tube containing a thin column of a liquid which rises and falls as the temperature rises and falls. ;an instrument for determining temperature;a piece of equipment that measures temperature;an instrument for measuring temperature, often a sealed glass tube that contains a column of liquid, as mercury, that expands and contracts, or rises and falls, with temperature changes, the temperature being read where the top of the column coincides with a calibrated scale marked on the tube or its frame.;An instrument for measuring temperature, especially one having a graduated glass tube with a bulb containing a liquid, typically mercury or colored alcohol, that expands and rises in the tube as the temperature increases.;An instrument for measuring and indicating temperature, typically one consisting of a narrow, hermetically sealed glass tube marked with graduations and having at one end a bulb containing mercury or alcohol which extends along the tube as it expands.;Precision;3
Toothbrush;A toothbrush is an oral hygiene instrument used to clean the teeth, gums, and tongue. It consists of a head of tightly clustered bristles, atop of which toothpaste can be applied, mounted on a handle which facilitates the cleaning of hard-to-reach areas of the mouth. They should be used in conjunction with something to clean between the teeth where the bristles of the toothbrush cannot reach - for example floss, tape or interdental brushes.;A brush, used with toothpaste, for cleaning the teeth.;small brush, has long handle, used to clean teeth;A toothbrush is a small brush that you use for cleaning your teeth. ;a brush for cleaning the teeth;a small brush used for cleaning your teeth;a small brush with a long handle, for cleaning the teeth. ;A brush used for cleaning teeth.;A small brush with a long handle, used for cleaning the teeth.;Precision;3
Tube;Tube or tubes may refer to:;Anything that is hollow and cylindrical in shape.;conduit consisting of a long hollow object (usually cylindrical) used to hold and conduct objects or liquids or gases;A tube is a long hollow object that is usually round, like a pipe. ;any of various usually cylindrical structures or devices: such as;a long narrow object similar to a pipe that liquid or gas can move through;a hollow, usually cylindrical body of metal, glass, rubber, or other material, used especially for conveying or containing liquids or gases.;A hollow cylinder, especially one that conveys a fluid or functions as a passage. An organic structure having the shape or function of a tube, a duct: a bronchial tube.;A long, hollow cylinder of metal, plastic, glass, etc. for holding or transporting something, chiefly liquids or gases.;Precision;3
Tweezers;Tweezers are small tools used for picking up objects too small to be easily handled with the human fingers. The tool is most likely derived from tongs, pincers, or scissors-like pliers used to grab or hold hot objects since the dawn of recorded history. In a scientific or medical context they are normally referred to as forceps.;A small pincerlike instrument, usually made of metal, used for handling or picking up small objects (such as postage stamps), plucking out (plucking) hairs, pulling out slivers, etc.;a hand tool for holding consisting of a compound lever for grasping;Tweezers are a small tool that you use for tasks such as picking up small objects or pulling out hairs. Tweezers consist of two strips of metal or plastic joined together at one end. ;any of various small metal instruments that are usually held between the thumb and index finger, are used for plucking, holding, or manipulating, and consist of two legs joined at one end;a tool that you use for picking up or removing very small objects. It consists of two narrow pieces of metal joined at one end;small pincers or nippers for plucking out hairs, extracting splinters, picking up small objects, etc.;Small pincers, usually of metal, used for plucking or handling small objects.;A small instrument like a pair of pincers for plucking out hairs and picking up small objects.;Precision;3
Vase;A vase ( or ) is an open container. It can be made from a number of materials, such as ceramics, glass, non-rusting metals, such as aluminium, brass, bronze, or stainless steel. Even wood has been used to make vases, either by using tree species that naturally resist rot, such as teak, or by applying a protective coating to conventional wood or plastic. Vases are often decorated, and they are often used to hold cut flowers. Vases come in different sizes to support whatever flower it is holding or keeping in place.;An upright open container used mainly for displaying fresh, dried, or artificial flowers.;an open jar of glass or porcelain used as an ornament or to hold flowers;A vase is a jar, usually made of glass or pottery, used for holding cut flowers or as an ornament. ;a usually round vessel of greater depth than width used chiefly as an ornament or for holding flowers;a container for cut flowers;a vessel, as of glass, porcelain, earthenware, or metal, usually higher than it is wide, used chiefly to hold cut flowers or for decoration.;An open container, as of glass or porcelain, used for holding flowers or for ornamentation.;A decorative container without handles, typically made of glass or china and used as an ornament or for displaying cut flowers.;Power;1
Wallet;A wallet is a small, flat case or pouch that can be used to carry such small personal items as paper currency, credit cards, and identification documents (driver's license, identification card, club card, etc.), photographs, transit pass, business cards and other paper or laminated cards. Wallets are generally made of leather or fabrics, and they are usually pocket-sized and foldable.;A small case, often flat and often made of leather, for keeping money (especially paper money), credit cards, etc.;a pocket-size case for holding papers and paper money;A wallet is a small flat folded case, usually made of leather or plastic, in which you can keep banknotes and credit cards. ;a bag for carrying miscellaneous articles while traveling;a small flat case that people keep money, bank cards, and small documents in and usually carry in their pocket or bag;a flat, folding pocketbook, especially one large enough to hold paper money, credit cards, driver's license, etc., and sometimes having a compartment for coins.;A flat pocket-sized folding case, usually made of leather, for holding paper money, cards, or photographs, a billfold.;A pocket-sized flat folding case for holding money and plastic cards.;Power;0
Walnut;A walnut is the nut of any tree of the genus "Juglans" (family Juglandaceae), particularly the Persian or English walnut, "Juglans regia".;A hardwood tree of the genus Juglans.;nut of any of various walnut trees having a wrinkled two-lobed seed with a hard shell;Walnuts are edible nuts which have a wrinkled shape and a hard round shell that is light brown in colour. ;the furrowed nut of any of a genus (Juglans of the family Juglandaceae, the walnut family) of deciduous trees;a tree that produces nuts and wood;the edible nut of trees of the genus Juglans, of the North Temperate Zone.Compare walnut family. ;ny of several deciduous trees of the genus Juglans, having pinnately compound leaves and fruits with a rounded sticky husk that encloses an edible seed with a hard shell. The nut or corrugated seed of any of these trees.;The large wrinkled edible seed of a deciduous tree, consisting of two halves contained within a hard shell which is enclosed in a green fruit.;Precision;2
Whisk;A whisk is a cooking utensil which can be used to blend ingredients smooth or to incorporate air into a mixture, in a process known as "whisking" or "whipping". Most whisks consist of a long, narrow handle with a series of wire loops joined at the end. The loops can have different shapes depending on a whisk's intended functions. The wires are usually metal, but some are plastic for use with nonstick cookware. Whisks are also made from bamboo.;A quick, light sweeping motion.;a mixer incorporating a coil of wires, used for whipping eggs or cream;A whisk is a kitchen tool used for whisking eggs or cream.;a quick light brushing or whipping motion;a kitchen tool that consists of several long closed curves of wire joined to a handle that you quickly move through a soft food to put air into it;an act of whisking.;A quick light sweeping motion.;A utensil for whipping eggs or cream.;Precision;3
Wine bottle;A wine bottle is a bottle, generally a glass bottle, that is used for holding wine. Some wines are fermented in the bottle while others are bottled only after fermentation. Recently the bottle has become a standard unit of volume to describe sales in the wine industry, measuring . Wine bottles are produced, however, in a variety of volumes and shapes.;A tall bottle with a long neck, normally made of dark or clear glass, for holding and serving wine.;;;;;;;A glass bottle for wine, the standard size holding 75 cl or 262/3 fl. oz.;Power;1
Wine glass;A wine glass is a type of glass that is used to drink and taste wine. Most wine glasses are stemware, that is they are goblets composed of three parts: the bowl, stem, and foot.;A glass vessel, normally with a stem, from which wine is drunk.;;A wine glass is a glass, usually with a narrow stem, which you use for drinking wine. ;a stemware drinking glass for wine;a glass with a thin stem and a base, used for drinking wine;;A glass, usually with a stem, from which wine is drunk.;A glass with a stem and foot, used for drinking wine.;Power;1